Utah statutes.
73-10c-10.   Origination fee.

(1)  The Drinking Water Board and the Water Quality Board may establish an origination fee for a loan to fund the administration of the programs created by this chapter by following the procedures and requirements of Section 63J-1-504.

(2)  The Drinking Water Board may establish an origination fee for a federally funded loan to fund the administration of programs allowed by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300j-12, and regulations created thereunder, by following the procedures and requirements of Section 63J-1-504.

(3)  An origination fee established in accordance with this section shall be part of the department fee schedule established under Section 19-1-201.

(4)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 63J-1-504, the board shall deposit a fee paid in accordance with this section in the origination fee subaccount created in Section 73-10c-5 and use the fee to administer this chapter.

(5)  The loan recipient may pay the origination fee from the loan proceeds.



Amended by Chapter 104, 2011 General Session

